District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3312.03a

Abatement of graffiti.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-203, § 4a
as added June 12, 2001, D.C. Law 13-309, § 2(b), 48 DCR 1613
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2302, 49 DCR 11664
Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 13(b)(1), 57 DCR 4353
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2302 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 13(b)(1) of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).